District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.08

Exchange of official personnel information.

The Mayor, pursuant to the provisions of §§ 1-628.01 and 1-631.02, shall enter into an agreement with the United States Civil Service Commission for the exchange of official personnel information, to the extent mutually agreed upon, between the District and federal government in accordance with limitations imposed by this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3108, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-632.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.8.